Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 5. Advance Payment of Higher Education Costs

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities § 20.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities § 31.

§ 21-16-501.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 26, § 1; 1991, ch. 141, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 21-16-502.
Advance payment contract. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 26, § 1; 1991, ch. 141, § 1; 1995, ch. 161, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 21-16-503.
Disposition and investment of advance payments; payment to institutions of higher education; administrative costs. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 26, § 1; 1991, ch. 141, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 21-16-504.
Refund of advance payment; conditions; direct payment of benefits. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 26, § 1; 1991, ch. 141, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 21-16-505.
Rules and regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 26, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 110, § 3, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 21-16-506.
Sunset provision. [Repealed]

History.

2016 ch. 110, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; repealed by 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.